Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 10 PESTICIDE APPLICATORS' ACT
35-10-117. Unlawful acts.

Unless otherwise authorized by law, it is unlawful and a violation of this article for any person:

To perform any of the acts for which licensure as a commercial applicator, qualified supervisor, certified operator, or private applicator is required without possessing a valid license to do so;

To hold oneself out as being so qualified to perform any of the acts for which licensure as a commercial applicator, qualified supervisor, or certified operator is required without possessing a valid license to perform such acts;

To solicit, advertise, or offer to perform any of the acts for which licensure as a commercial applicator, qualified supervisor, or certified operator is required without possessing a valid license to perform such acts; to act as an agent for any principal to solicit from any person the purchase of pesticide application or pest control services from the principal when the principal does not possess a valid license to perform the services being offered; or to enter into a contract to perform such services;

To refuse to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued pursuant to section 35-10-120;

To refuse or fail to comply with the provisions of this article;

To make false, misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representations.

No claims of absolute safety shall be made for any product regulated by this article.

To impersonate any state, county, city and county, or municipal official or inspector;

To refuse or fail to comply with any rules or regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this article or to any lawful order issued by the commissioner;

To use, store, or dispose of pesticides, pesticide containers, rinsates, or other related materials, or to supervise or recommend such acts, in a manner inconsistent with labeling directions or requirements, unless otherwise provided for by law, or in an unsafe, negligent, or fraudulent manner; or

To refuse or fail to comply with any requirements of the federal worker protection standards set forth in 40 CFR 170.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article for any person acting as a commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator, or as a qualified supervisor or certified operator:

To use, store, or dispose of pesticides, pesticide containers, rinsates, or other related materials, or to supervise or recommend such acts, in a manner inconsistent with labeling directions or requirements, unless otherwise provided for by law, or in an unsafe, negligent, or fraudulent manner;

To use or recommend the use of any pesticide not registered with the department pursuant to article 9 of this title or to use or recommend the use of a pesticide in any manner inconsistent with the restrictions of the commissioner or the administrator;

To use or recommend the use of any device that requires licensure for use in any manner inconsistent with the restrictions of the commissioner or the administrator;

To use any device that requires licensure for use or any pesticide, or to direct or recommend such use, without providing appropriate supervision, including, but not limited to, the application of any pesticide without providing the supervision of a qualified supervisor licensed in that class or subclass of pesticide application;

To maintain or supervise the maintenance of any device that requires licensure for use or pesticide application equipment, including, but not limited to, loading pumps, hoses, or metering devices, in an unsafe or negligent manner;

To fail to provide the notification required pursuant to section 35-10-112 (1)(c);

To make false or misleading representations or statements of fact in any application, record, or report required by this article or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

To fail to maintain or submit any records or reports required by this article or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article for any commercial applicator, qualified supervisor, or certified operator:

To permit the use of his license by any other person;

To use or supervise or recommend the use of any device that requires licensure for use, or any pesticide, which, including but not limited to generally accepted standards of practice, would be ineffective or inappropriate for the pest problem being treated;

To use any device that requires licensure for use or apply any pesticide or to recommend or supervise such acts in any manner that fails to meet generally accepted standards for such use or application except as provided by subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c).

If a commercial applicator receives instructions from a party contracting for such applicator's services and the commercial applicator knows or should know that using the device or applying the pesticide in the manner specified by the contracting party may not or does not meet generally accepted standards for such use or application, the commercial applicator must so inform the contracting party. If the contracting party, after being so advised, continues to require the commercial applicator to perform the application or use the device according to these instructions, the commercial applicator may follow these instructions for such application or use unless such application or use would violate any of the directions contained on the pesticide or the device or the labeling of either or would violate any provision of this article or article 9 of this title or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article or article 9 of this title. If the commercial applicator complies with these requirements, the party contracting for such application of any pesticide or use of any device shall have no cause of action for damages against the commercial applicator if the application or use causes death or injury to the contracting party or his property or is unsatisfactory in its result, unless the contracting party establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that such death, injury, or unsatisfactory result resulted from negligence or an intentional act not encompassed within or necessitated by the instructions provided by such contracting party.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article for any commercial applicator:

To operate any device that requires licensure for use, or to apply any pesticide, if the insurance required by section 35-10-106 (1)(a) is not in full force and effect at the time of such use or application, or if it does not have on file with the department, in the form and manner designated by the commissioner, verification that said insurance is in full force and effect;

To fail to provide any customer with any information required to be so provided by this article or by any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article for any employee or official of the department to disclose or use for his own advantage any information derived from any applications, reports, or records, including medical records, submitted to the department pursuant to this article or to reveal such information to anyone except authorized persons, who may include officials or employees of the state, the federal government, the courts of this or other states, and physicians.

The failure by any person to comply with the provisions of subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(f), or (4)(b) of this section is a deceptive trade practice and is subject to the protections of the "Colorado Consumer Protection Act", article 1 of title 6, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1583, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (3)(b), (3)(c)(I), and (4)(a) amended and (2)(b.5) added, p. 294, § 7, effective July 1; (1)(a) and IP(2) amended and (1)(i) and (1)(j) added, p. 1264, § 10, effective January 1, 2007.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-114 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-117.5. Unlawful acts for licensed private applicators.

It is unlawful and a violation of this article for a licensed private applicator:

To make false or misleading representations or statements of fact in any license, application, record, or report required by this article or any rules adopted pursuant thereto;

To fail to maintain or submit any records or reports required by this article or any rules adopted pursuant thereto; or

To permit the use of a private applicator license by any person other than the person to whom the license was issued.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1264, § 11, effective January 1, 2007.

35-10-118. Powers and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to administer and enforce the provisions of this article and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt all reasonable rules for the administration and enforcement of this article, including, but not limited to:

The regulation of all aspects of pesticide application, including, but not limited to, the storage, use, application, and disposal of any pesticide or device that requires licensure for use by any person subject to this article;

The establishment of qualifications for any applicant and standards of practice for any of the licenses authorized under this article, including the establishment of classifications and subclassifications for any license authorized under this article;

The issuance and reinstatement of any license authorized under this article and the grounds for any disciplinary actions authorized under this article, including letters of admonition, other discipline through stipulation, or the restriction, probation, denial, suspension, or revocation of any license authorized under this article;

The content of the examination required for the administration of this article and the amount of any examination and examination grading fee.

The commissioner shall, for examinations required for any license under this article:

Develop each such examination, or adopt a commercially standardized examination, required for the administration of this article and the amount of any examination and examination grading fee;

Establish a passing score for each examination that reflects a minimum level of competency in the class or subclass for which the applicant is being tested;

Administer each such examination or contract with a person, corporation, or other entity to administer each such examination.

The commissioner shall establish standards and procedures to issue a license to any person who possesses a valid license from another jurisdiction, where the qualifications for that license are substantially similar to those adopted for a comparable license authorized under this article.

The commissioner shall establish any competency requirements and standards for any individuals licensed under section 35-10-115.

The commissioner is authorized to conduct hearings required under sections 35-10-119 and 35-10-120 pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and to use administrative law judges to conduct such hearings when their use would result in a net saving of costs to the department.

The commissioner is authorized to determine the amount of any licensing fee authorized under this article based on the actual cost of administering and enforcing the article and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with any agency or political subdivision of this state or any other state, or with any agency of the United States government, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article, receiving grants-in-aid, securing uniformity of rules, and entering into reciprocal licensing agreements.

(8.5) (a) The department may provide the following only to the extent of funding received pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (8.5):

Education programs for urban residents regarding the proper use of pesticides and regarding the dangers of misuse or overuse of pesticides; and

Education programs for firefighters regarding precautions and procedures that are necessary when fighting fires that involve or are in the vicinity of pesticides or fertilizers.

The commissioner may accept gifts, grants, and donations of any kind from any private or public source for the purposes of this subsection (8.5). The commissioner shall transmit all such gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to comply with the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", as amended; except that such rules and regulations shall not contravene any provision of this article, article 9 of this title, or any other provision of state law.

(9.5) The commissioner shall designate by rule which devices, when operated for hire, require the operator to be licensed as a commercial applicator. Licensure shall be required only for the use of those devices that, as determined by the commissioner, may constitute a significant risk to public health or safety.

The powers and duties vested in the commissioner by this article may be delegated to qualified employees of the department.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1585, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2)(c) and (3) amended and (8.5) added, p. 1377, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(d), and (3) amended and (9.5) added, p. 295, §§ 8, 9, effective July 1; (8.5)(b) amended, p. 1265, § 12, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(8.5)(b) amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 316, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-10-104 and 35-10-117 as they existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", see Pub.L. 92-516, codified at 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.

35-10-119. Inspections - investigations - access - subpoena.

The commissioner shall provide for the inspection and analysis of pesticides being used and for the inspection of equipment, devices that require licensure for use, or apparatus used for the application of pesticides, and the commissioner may require proper repairs or other changes before further use.

The commissioner, upon his own motion or upon the complaint of any person, may make any and all investigations necessary to insure compliance with this article.

Complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of his investigations may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection, except to the person in interest, as defined in section 24-72-202 (4), C.R.S., or as provided by court order, during the investigatory period and until dismissed or until notice of hearing and charges are served on a licensee.

At any reasonable time during regular business hours, the commissioner shall have free and unimpeded access upon consent or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant:

To any land, water, or structures thereon in which any devices that require licensure for use, pesticides, containers, rinsates, or other related materials are or have been kept, used, stored, handled, processed, disposed of, or transported for the purpose of carrying out any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article;

To all records required to be kept and may make copies of such records for the purpose of carrying out any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article.

The commissioner shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey any subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1587, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1) and (4)(a) amended, p. 296, § 10, effective July 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 1265, § 13, effective January 1, 2007.

35-10-120. Enforcement.

The commissioner or his designee shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease forthwith. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request, at the person's discretion, a hearing to be held within a reasonable period of time to determine whether or not such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be determined promptly.

Whenever the commissioner possesses sufficient evidence satisfactory to him indicating that any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted under this article, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1587, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1378, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-10-118 and 35-10-119 as they existed prior to 1990.

35-10-121. Disciplinary actions - denial of license.

The commissioner may issue letters of admonition, impose other discipline through stipulation, or restrict, impose probation on, deny, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke any license or registration authorized under this article if the applicant, registrant, or licensee:

Has refused or failed to comply with any provision of this article, any rule or regulation adopted under this article, or any lawful order of the commissioner;

Has been convicted of a felony for an offense related to the conduct regulated by this article;

Has had an equivalent license or registration denied, revoked, or suspended by any authority;

Has been adjudicated a violator or has committed a violation of the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", as amended; except that a consent decree entered into with the EPA shall not be considered a violation of such act unless an order from the regional administrator of the EPA or the consent decree shall specifically state that a violation has occurred;

Has refused to provide the commissioner with reasonable, complete, and accurate information regarding methods or materials used or work performed when requested by the commissioner; or

Has falsified any information requested by the commissioner.

In any proceeding held under this section, the commissioner may accept as prima facie evidence of grounds for disciplinary action any disciplinary action taken against a licensee, registrant, or certified person from another jurisdiction if the violation that prompted the disciplinary action in that jurisdiction would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section.

(2.5) Proceedings under this section shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.; except that section 24-4-104 (3), C.R.S., shall not apply to such proceedings in cases of deliberate or willful violation; in cases of violation of labeling directions or requirements; or in cases in which the actions or omissions of the licensee or registrant in violation of this article have caused or threatened to cause substantial danger or harm to public health and safety, to property, or to the environment, as defined by the commissioner pursuant to section 35-10-118 (2). In such cases, no revocation, suspension, limitation, or modification of a license or registration shall be lawful unless the commissioner has given the licensee or registrant notice in writing regarding any facts or conduct that may warrant such action and has afforded the licensee or registrant opportunity to submit written data, views, and arguments with respect to such facts or conduct.

No licensee or registrant whose license or registration has been revoked may apply or reapply for any license or registration under this article until two years after the date of such revocation.

Any person aggrieved by a final disciplinary action taken by the commissioner may appeal such action to the Colorado court of appeals in accordance with section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1588, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended and (2.5) and (4) added, p. 1378, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

IP(1), (1)(c), (2), (2.5), and (3) amended, p. 1265, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-112 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act", see Pub.L. 92-516, codified at 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.

35-10-122. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that the person has violated the provision, rule, or regulation for the second time.

No civil penalty may be imposed by the commissioner unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction may consider the effect of such penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1589, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1379, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-120 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-123. Criminal penalties.

No person may be charged under this section unless it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., that such person has twice committed the violation to be charged; except that this subsection (1) shall not apply to any person who violates any of the provisions of section 35-10-117 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(g), and (5).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 35-10-117 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(g), (1)(i), (1)(j), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (3)(a), or (4)(a) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 35-10-117 (1)(f), (2)(f), (2)(g), (4)(b), and (5) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1589, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1547, § 306, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1266, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3277, § 619, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-120 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (2) and (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-10-124. Information.

The commissioner, in cooperation with other agencies of this state or the federal government, may publish information pertaining to the use and handling of pesticides and conduct workshops for the purpose of informing the pesticide applicators of new developments in the field of pesticides.

The commissioner shall provide internet access to finalized enforcement action information to the general public consisting of, at a minimum, the name of the violator, date of the action, city or county in which the violation occurred, nearest major intersection of roads to where the violation occurred, and final enforcement disposition. The commissioner shall publish the information in a form and manner designated by the commissioner within thirty days after the final disposition.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1589, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 695, § 7, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-116 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-125. Advisory committee.

The state agricultural commission created by section 35-1-105 shall appoint an advisory committee of fifteen members to advise the commissioner on agricultural, human health, environmental, wildlife, worker safety, and other matters regarding the use of pesticides in Colorado and to assist the commissioner in promulgating rules to carry out this article.

The committee is a state public body, as that term is defined in section 24-6-402 (1)(d), C.R.S., and consists of the following members:

A formulator, or his Colorado representative, actively engaged in the sale of pesticides in Colorado;

A commercial applicator, licensed under this article, who is actively engaged in the commercial application of pesticides for the control of agricultural crop pests;

A commercial applicator, licensed under this article, who is actively engaged in the commercial application of pesticides for the control of turf or ornamental pests;

A commercial applicator, licensed under this article, who is actively engaged in the application of pesticides for the control of structural pests;

A qualified supervisor, employed by a limited commercial applicator registered under this article, who is actively engaged in the application of pesticides;

Two representatives from public applicators registered under this article, each of whom shall be an elected official or a designee thereof;

A representative from Colorado state university agricultural experiment station or extension service;

Two representatives from the Colorado department of public health and environment, both of whom have expertise in either:

Human health with respect to toxicology, pest-related disease vectors, and epidemiology;

Hazardous materials and food safety;

Air pollution and hazardous pesticide air pollutants; or

Water pollution and agricultural activities;

Two representatives from the general public, one of whom is actively engaged in urban agricultural production;

A member of a state or national apiary or beekeeper association who is currently active in apiary management and who is either an elected official of or a designee of the association;

A representative from the agricultural sector who is a worker, as that term is defined in 40 CFR 170.3; and

A representative from the agricultural sector who is actively engaged in organic agricultural production.

All members of the advisory committee, with the exception of the formulator, shall be residents of this state.

The appointment of the formulator, the commercial applicator engaged in the control of agricultural crop pests, and one of the representatives from a registered public applicator shall expire on January 1, 1991; and the appointment of the commercial applicator engaged in the control of turf or ornamental pests, the representative from the general public who is actively engaged in agricultural production, the qualified supervisor employed by a registered limited commercial applicator, and the representative from the department of health shall expire on January 1, 1992. The initial appointment of all other members shall be for a term of three years. Thereafter, the appointment of each member to the committee shall be for a term of three years.

Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary traveling and subsistence expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of such committee.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1589, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(6) repealed, p. 31, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2006:

(2)(e) and (4) amended, p. 1266, § 16, effective July 1; (2)(h) amended, p. 296, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1), IP(2), (2)(h), and (2)(i) amended and (2)(j), (2)(k), and (2)(l) added, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 695, § 8, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-121 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-126. Transfer of moneys to plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund - fees.

All fees and civil fines collected pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the plant health, pest control, and environmental protection cash fund created in section 35-1-106.3.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1590, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1266, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 317, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-107 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-127. Deadline for promulgation of rules and regulations for implementation of article, as amended. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1590, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 296, § 12, effective July 1.

35-10-128. Repeal of article - review of functions.

Effective September 1, 2023, this article 10 is repealed. Prior to the repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the regulation by the commissioner of the application of pesticides pursuant to this article 10 as provided for in section 24-34-104, C.R.S., and shall report on the extent of local regulation of pesticides pursuant to section 31-15-707 (1)(b), C.R.S., or under the police power of any political subdivision of the state.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1590, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 63, effective April 20.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 997, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 296, § 13, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1267, § 18, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1267, § 19, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 693, § 2, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-125 as it existed prior to 1990.